Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Strategic Planning for Children in Placement

194A.145.
Legislative findings and declarations. [Repealed]

History.
Repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2005, ch. 99, § 31, effective June 20, 2005; repealed by 2020 ch. 36, § 44, effective July 15, 2020.

194A.146.
Statewide Strategic Planning Committee for Children in Placement — Membership — Plans — Review — Information Systems — Study of changes in child welfare delivery — Annual report. [Repealed]

History.
Repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2005, ch. 85, § 617, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 99, § 32, effective June 20, 2005; 2012, ch. 146, § 23, effective July 12, 2012; 2012, ch. 158, § 18, effective July 12, 2012; 2018 ch. 159, § 50, effective July 14, 2018; repealed by 2020 ch. 36, § 44, effective July 15, 2020.

194A.150.
State officials as voting members of citizens’ councils.

When federal programs require a particular citizens’ council within or attached to the cabinet to include state officials as voting members, the secretary shall, for the specific purposes of those federal programs, be authorized to vote in those council meetings and shall further be authorized to call upon either the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, the chief state school officer, the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, the secretary of the Public Protection Cabinet, the secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet, the secretary of the Labor Cabinet, the secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development, the executive director of the Council on Higher Education, or any combination of the above as may be appropriate, to be voting members of expanded citizens’ councils for the purposes of these federal programs. The secretary shall exercise this prerogative only when the federal programs specifically require that state officials be voting members of the citizens’ councils.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 426, § 16, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 157, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 219, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 241, effective July 15, 2010.

194A.160.
Alternates or representatives for boards, commissions, and similar bodies.

The secretary and other state officials with the approval of the secretary may designate alternatives or representatives to serve in their capacity as members of all boards, commissions, councils, institutes, and other similar bodies within or attached to the cabinet. The secretary or the secretary’s designee shall be an ex officio member of all boards, committees, councils, institutes, and other similar bodies within or attached to the cabinet.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 426, § 17, effective July 15, 1998.

194A.170.
Secretary’s authority to create special task forces, advisory committees, and other citizens’ panels.

The secretary is authorized to create special task forces, technical advisory committees, and other citizens’ panels as may be necessary to support the operations of the cabinet. No other officials of the cabinet shall be authorized to create citizens’ panels associated with the cabinet, its programs, or suborganizational units, and the secretary shall not delegate this authority.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 426, § 18, effective July 15, 1998.

194A.180.
Administrative regulations and decisions of various bodies transferred to Advisory Council for Medical Assistance.

All administrative regulations, acts, determinations, and decisions of and by the corporate bodies or instrumentalities of the Commonwealth, advisory committees, interstate compacts, or other statutory bodies, transferred in whole or in part to the Advisory Council for Medical Assistance, shall remain in effect as the administrative regulations, acts, determinations, and decisions of the cabinet unless duly modified or repealed by the secretary.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 426, § 19, effective July 15, 1998; 2020 ch. 36, § 8, effective July 15, 2020.

194A.182.
Continued viability of administrative regulations and decisions of predecessor bodies of the Institute for Aging.

All administrative regulations, acts, determinations, and decisions of or by the corporate bodies or instrumentalities of the Commonwealth, advisory committees, interstate compacts, or other statutory bodies transferred in whole or in part to the Institute for Aging shall remain in effect as administrative regulations, acts, determinations, and decisions of the cabinet unless duly modified or repealed by the secretary.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 6, § 8, effective July 14, 2000.

194A.190.
Gifts and grants to the Advisory Council for Medical Assistance.

The Advisory Council for Medical Assistance shall be empowered to accept gifts and grants, but all of these moneys shall be administered by the cabinet, which shall administer these funds through appropriate trust and agency accounts.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 426, § 20, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 6, § 10, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 28, effective June 20, 2005; 2017 ch. 80, § 19, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 36, § 9, effective July 15, 2020.

194A.200.
Compensation and expenses of members of the Public Health Services Advisory Council and the Institute for Aging — Members of citizens’ councils not public officers. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 426, § 21, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 6, § 11, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 29, effective June 20, 2005; 2017 ch. 80, § 20, effective June 29, 2017; repealed by 2020 ch. 36, § 44, effective July 15, 2020.

194A.350.
Liability insurance for physicians, hospital administrators, and directors employed by cabinet.

The secretary of the cabinet is authorized to purchase liability insurance for the protection of physicians, hospital administrators, and directors employed by the cabinet to protect them from liability for acts, omissions, and claims of medical malpractice arising in the course and scope of their employment of service to the cabinet.

The secretary may purchase the type and amount of liability coverage deemed appropriate to best serve the cabinet’s interest.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 426, § 22, effective July 15, 1998.

194A.360.
Update of database.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall update its database within thirty (30) days of receipt of information. The update shall include information from the:

Offender records;

Institutional records; and

Administrative records.

History.
Repealed, reenact., and amend. Acts 2002, ch. 257, § 18, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 99, § 158, effective June 20, 2005.

194A.365.
Annual report on committed children — Contents.

The cabinet shall make an annual report to the Governor, the Child Welfare Oversight and Advisory Committee established in KRS 6.943, and the Chief Justice. The report shall be tendered not later than December 1 of each year and shall include information for the previous fiscal year. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:

The number of children under an order of dependent, status, public, or voluntary commitment to the cabinet, according to: permanency planning goals, current placement, average number of placements, type of commitment, and the average length of time children remain committed to the cabinet;

The number of children in the custody of the cabinet in the following types of residential placements, the average length of stay in these placements, and the average number of placements experienced by these children: family foster homes, private child care facilities, and placement with biological parent or person exercising custodial control or supervision;

The number of children in the custody of the cabinet eligible for adoption, the number placed in an adoptive home, and the number ineligible for adoption and the reasons therefor;

The cost in federal and state general funds to care for the children defined in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, including the average cost per child for each type of placement, direct social worker services, operating expenses, training, and administrative costs; and

Any other matters relating to the care of foster children that the cabinet deems appropriate and that may promote further understanding of the impediments to providing permanent homes for foster children.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 426, §
47, effective July 15, 1998; repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2005, ch. 99, § 33, effective July 20, 2005; 2018 ch. 159, § 51, effective July 14, 2018.

194A.370.
Professional development for staff on child development and abuse.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall provide professional development for staff employed by the cabinet or by local public agencies in child development, the dynamics of physical and sexual abuse, the impact of violence on child development, the treatment of offenders, and related issues. Each staff person who is employed by the cabinet or by a local public agency and who works with children or with families shall successfully complete the professional development program in order to remain assigned to child or family programs. The cabinet shall specify the manner of professional development and related matters by administrative regulation.

History.
Repealed and reenact., Acts 2005, ch. 99, § 34, effective July 20, 2005.

194A.380.
Definitions for KRS 194A.380 to 194A.383.

As used in KRS 194A.380 to 194A.383:

“Criminal offense against a minor” means a conviction or a plea of guilty to any of the following offenses if the victim is under the age of eighteen (18) at the time of the commission of the offense:

Kidnapping, as in KRS 509.040, except by a parent;

Unlawful imprisonment, as in KRS 509.020, except by a parent;

Sexual misconduct as in KRS 510.140;

Use of a minor in a sexual performance, as in KRS 531.310;

Promoting a sexual performance of a minor, as in KRS 531.320;

Possession or viewing matter portraying a sexual performance by a minor, as in KRS 531.335;

Distribution of matter portraying a sexual performance by a minor, as in KRS 531.340;

Promoting the sale of material portraying a sexual performance by a minor, as in KRS 531.350;

Advertising material portraying a sexual performance by a minor, as in KRS 531.360;

Using minors to distribute material portraying a sexual performance by a minor, as in KRS 531.370;

Human trafficking involving commercial sexual activity, as in KRS 529.100;

Promoting prostitution, as in KRS 529.040, when the defendant advances or profits from the prostitution of a person under the age of eighteen (18);

Unlawful transaction with a minor in the first degree, as in KRS 530.064(1)(a);

Any attempt to commit any of the offenses described in paragraphs (a) to (m) of this subsection; or

Solicitation to commit any of the offenses described in paragraphs (a) to (m) of this subsection;

“Local government” means a city, county, consolidated local government, urban-county government, unified local government, or charter county government;

“Local government youth day camp” means a camp operated by a local government for all or part of a day, whether free or for a fee, for five (5) or more children under eighteen (18) years of age outside the presence of their parent or guardian for recreational or educational purposes for four (4) or more consecutive hours per day during school vacation periods, school breaks, or school cancellations;

“Sex crime” means a conviction or a plea of guilty to any of the following offenses:

Rape in the first degree as in KRS 510.040;

Rape in the second degree as in KRS 510.050;

Rape in the third degree as in KRS 510.060;

Sodomy in the first degree as in KRS 510.070;

Sodomy in the second degree as in KRS 510.080;

Sodomy in the third degree as in KRS 510.090;

Sodomy in the fourth degree as in KRS 510.100;

Sexual abuse in the first degree as in KRS 510.110;

Sexual abuse in the second degree as in KRS 510.120;

Sexual abuse in the third degree as in KRS 510.130;

Indecent exposure in the first degree as in KRS 510.148;

Indecent exposure in the second degree as in KRS 510.150;

Unlawful use of electronic means originating or received within the Commonwealth to induce a minor to engage in sexual or other prohibited activities as in KRS 510.155; or

Incest as in KRS 530.020;

“Staff member” means:

An individual who is employed by a youth camp or camp or a local government youth day camp for compensation;

A contract employee or a self-employed individual whose employment directly involves the care or supervision of children or unsupervised access to children placed with a youth camp or camp or a local government youth day camp; or

A volunteer or intern whose activities on behalf of a youth camp or camp or a local government youth day camp directly involves the care or supervision of children or unsupervised access to children placed with a youth camp or camp or a local government youth day camp;

“Violent offender” means any person who has been convicted of or who has entered a plea of guilty to the commission of a capital offense, Class A felony, Class B felony involving the death of the victim or serious physical injury to the victim, or rape in the first degree, or sodomy in the first degree; and

“Youth camp” or “camp” means:

Any camp required pursuant to KRS 211.180 to obtain a permit to operate; and

Any program offered, whether free or for a fee, for recreational, educational, sports training, or vacation purposes to children under eighteen (18) years of age that a child attends outside the presence of his or her parent or legal guardian.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 115, § 4, effective July 1, 2018; 2021 ch. 90, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

194A.381.
Nonapplicability of KRS 194A.380 to 194A.383 to specified circumstances.

KRS 194A.380 to 194A.383 shall not apply to:

Public school districts or programs sponsored by the school district;

Private schools;

Child-care centers, child-caring and child-placing agencies; family child-care homes; and foster care, relative caregiver services or adoptive homes otherwise governed by KRS Chapter 199; or

Babysitting or child-care arrangements made by a child’s parent or guardian and occurring within a private home.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 115, § 5, effective July 1, 2018.

194A.382.
Prohibition of employment by youth camp or local government youth day camp receiving public funds of a staff member who has been convicted of criminal offense against a minor or a sex crime, is a violent offender, or has been found to have abused or neglected a child.

A youth camp or camp or a local government youth day camp that receives public funds shall not employ, contract, or utilize as a volunteer, in any position, any staff member who has been convicted of or who has entered a plea of guilty to a criminal offense against a minor or a sex crime, who is a violent offender, or who has been found by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or a court to have abused or neglected a child.

Prior to employing, contracting with, or allowing volunteer work, each youth camp or camp or a local government youth day camp that receives public funds shall obtain from the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet a national and state criminal background check of the applicant, contractor, or volunteer who is or intends to become a staff member prior to the individual’s presence at the camp or involvement in any program of the camp.

Prior to employing, contracting with, or allowing volunteer work, each youth camp or camp or a local government youth day camp that receives public funds shall require an applicant to obtain a letter from the Cabinet for Health and Family Services stating the individual is clear to hire based on no findings of substantiated child abuse or neglect found through a background check of child abuse and neglect records maintained by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services of the applicant, contractor, or volunteer who intends to become a staff member prior to the individual’s presence at the camp or involvement in any program of the camp.

Each application form provided by a youth camp or camp or a local government youth day camp that receives public funds to an applicant or volunteer who intends to become a staff member shall in a prominent place and legible font conspicuously state the following: “STATE LAW REQUIRES A NATIONAL AND STATE CRIMINAL BACKGROUND CHECK AND A LETTER FROM THE CABINET FOR HEALTH AND FAMILY SERVICES STATING THE STAFF MEMBER IS CLEAR TO HIRE BASED ON NO FINDINGS OF SUBSTANTIATED CHILD ABUSE OR NEGLECT FOUND THROUGH A BACKGROUND CHECK OF CHILD ABUSE AND NEGLECT RECORDS AS A CONDITION OF EMPLOYMENT OR INVOLVEMENT IN THIS PROGRAM.”

Any request for records under this section shall be on a form approved by the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, and the cabinet may charge a fee to be paid by the applicant in an amount no greater than the actual cost of processing the request.

This section shall apply to all applicants and volunteers in a position which involves supervisory or disciplinary power over a minor, who intend to become staff members.

This section shall not be construed to prohibit an exempted organization from requiring its employees, contractors, or volunteers to submit to a background check. A youth camp or camp or a local government youth day camp that does not receive public funds may require its employees, contractor, or volunteers to submit to a criminal background check and to have a letter, provided by the individual, from the Cabinet for Health and Family Services stating the individual has no findings of substantiated child abuse or neglect found through a background check of child abuse and neglect records maintained by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.

This section shall not be construed to require a youth camp or camp or a local government youth day camp that receives public funds to employ, contract with, or allow volunteering by, an individual solely on the basis of an acceptable criminal background check.

This section shall not limit the ability of a youth camp or camp or a local government youth day camp that receives public funds to establish a more stringent background check process for its employees, contractors, or volunteers regarding other criminal offenses which, in the discretion of the youth camp or camp or a local government youth day camp that receives public funds, would disqualify the individual from involvement with the youth camp or camp or a local government youth day camp.

The form for requesting a letter, required by this section, stating a staff member is clear to hire based on a background check of child abuse and neglect records maintained by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall be made available on the Cabinet for Health and Family Services Web site.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2017, ch. 115, § 6, effective July 1, 2018; 2021 ch. 90, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

194A.3821.
Local government youth day camp — License, permit, background checks.

A local government youth day camp shall not be required:

To be licensed as a child care center as defined in KRS 199.894; or

To obtain a permit under KRS 211.180.

A local government youth day camp shall comply with background checks required under KRS 194A.382.

HISTORY:
2021 ch. 90, § 4, effective June 29, 2021.

194A.383.
Penalty for violation of KRS 194A.382.

Failure to comply with KRS 194A.382 will result in immediate suspension of the entity’s permit until compliance is obtained.

If any employee, contractor, or volunteer who is a staff member is discovered to be a violent offender or has been convicted of a sex crime or a criminal offense against a minor, or has been found by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services to have abused or neglected a child, and if he or she has waived the right to appeal a substantiated finding of child abuse or neglect or if the substantiated incident was upheld upon appeal, he or she shall be immediately terminated from participation with the program and removed from the property.

Any person who owns or operates a youth camp or camp or a local government youth day camp that receives public funds and who knowingly allows an individual who is a staff member to serve or continue to serve as an employee, contractor, or volunteer despite a conviction or offense specified in this section shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor for the first offense and a Class D felony for each subsequent offense.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2017, ch. 115, § 7, effective July 1, 2018; 2021 ch. 90, § 3, effective June 29, 2021.